Tennessee, session 114, SB2035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 140, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
An air medical communications specialist must be certified within six (6) months
of employment from one (1) of the following:
(1) A flight program that is accredited by the Commission on
Accreditations of Medical Transport Systems (CAMTS) as outlined in the current
or future revised Accreditation Standards of the Commission on Accreditation of
Medical Transport Systems; or
(2) A flight program through the International Association of Medical
Transport Communication Specialists.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2035
011175
- 1 -